Hawaii statutes.
§383-104 State employment service. The
provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act, as amended, are accepted by this State and
the department of labor and industrial relations is designated and constituted
the agency of this State for the purpose of the Act. The department shall
establish and maintain free public employment offices in such number and in
such places as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter
and for the purposes of performing such functions as are within the purview of
the Wagner-Peyser Act. For the purpose of establishing and maintaining free
public employment offices and promoting the use of their facilities, the
department may enter into agreements with the Railroad Retirement Board, or any
other agency of the United States, or of this or any other state charged with
the administration of any law whose purposes are reasonably related to the
purposes of this chapter, and as a part of such agreements may accept moneys,
services, or quarters as a contribution to the maintenance of the state system
of public employment offices or as reimbursement for services performed. All
moneys received for such purposes shall be deposited with the director of
finance of the State and shall be expended subject to regulations of the federal
government and subject to appropriation, budgeting, and accounting requirements
of the State. [L 1939, c 219, §11; am L 1941, c 304, §1, subs 33; RL 1945,
§4282; RL 1955, §93-103; am L 1957, c 205, §1(f); am L 1959, c 265, pt of §13;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 27; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §383-104]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next